Utah statutes.
77-32a-3.   Ability to pay considered.

The court shall not include in the judgment a sentence that a defendant pay costs unless the defendant is or will be able to pay them. In determining the amount and method of payment of costs, the court shall take account of the financial resources of the defendant and the nature of the burden that payment of costs will impose and that restitution be the first priority.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

